el: Τύπος σύνδεσης μπρελόκ: Κλιπ σήματος με καρούλι; Κλιπ ζώνης; Κρίκος (καραμπίνερ); Κρίκος κλειδιών και αλυσίδα; Κούμπωμα τύπου κάβουρα; Μαγνητικό κούμπωμα; S-biner (κρίκος με διπλό κλείστρο); Κούμπωμα με βιδωτή ασφάλεια; Διαχωριζόμενος κρίκος; Περιστρεφόμενο γαντζάκι; Κλιπ με σκανδάλη; Άλλο
pl: Typ mocowania breloka: Zwijany klips do identyfikatora; Klips do paska; Karabińczyk; Kółko do kluczy z łańcuszkiem; Zapięcie typu karabińczyk; Zapięcie magnetyczne; S-biner (karabińczyk dwustronny); Zapięcie zakręcane; Kółko sprężyste; Karabińczyk obrotowy; Karabińczyk spustowy; Inne
es: Tipo de enganche para llavero: Clip tipo carrete para emblema; Clip para cinturón; Mosquetón; Anilla para llaves y cadena; Cierre de pinza de langosta; Cierre magnético; Mosquetón en S (mosquetón de doble cierre); Cierre de rosca; Anilla dividida; Mosquetón giratorio; Clip de gatillo; Otro
sk-SK: Typ upevnenia kľúčenky: Spona na rolovacie puzdro na menovku; Spona na opasok; Karabína; Krúžok na kľúče a retiazka; Karabínka s obrtlíkom; Magnetická spona; S-biner (karabína s dvojitou bránou); Spona so skrutkovacím zámkom; Dvojitý krúžok; Otočná karabína; Západková spona; Iné
vi: Loại móc khóa: Kẹp rút thẻ tên; Kẹp thắt lưng; Móc carabiner; Vòng chìa khóa + dây xích; Khóa càng cua; Khóa nam châm; S-biner (móc chữ S); Khóa vặn ốc; Vòng xỏ khuyên; Móc xoay; Móc cò súng; Khác
fi: Avaimenperän kiinnitystyyppi: Tunnuskelaklipsi; Vyöklipsi; Karabiini; Avainrengas ja ketju; Papukaijalukko; Magneettilukko; S-biner (kaksiporttinen karabiini); Ruuvilukollinen haka; Jaettu rengas; Pyörivä pikalukko; Liipaisinhaka; Muu
ja: キーホルダー取り付けタイプ: バッジリールクリップ; ベルトクリップ; カラビナ; キーリング + チェーン; ロブスタークラスプ; マグネットクラスプ; S ビナー (ダブルゲートカラビナ); スクリューロッククラスプ; スプリットリング; スイベルスナップフック; トリガークリップ; その他
fr: Type d’attache du porte-clés: Clip d’enrouleur de badge; Clip de ceinture; Mousqueton; Anneau porte-clés et chaîne; Fermoir mousqueton; Fermoir magnétique; Mousqueton en S (mousqueton à double doigt); Fermoir à vis; Anneau brisé; Mousqueton pivotant; Mousqueton à gâchette; Autre
ru: Тип крепления брелока: Зажим-рулетка для бейджа; Зажим для ремня; Карабин; Кольцо для ключей и цепочка; Застежка-карабин; Магнитная застежка; S-образный карабин (двусторонний); Застежка с винтовым замком; Заводное кольцо; Карабин с вертлюгом; Карабин с курком; Другое
it: Tipo di attacco del portachiavi: Clip per portabadge estensibile; Clip da cintura; Moschettone; Anello portachiavi e catena; Chiusura a moschettone; Chiusura magnetica; S-Biner (moschettone a doppia leva); Chiusura con bloccaggio a vite; Anello brisé; Moschettone girevole; Moschettone a pinza; Altro
tr: Anahtarlık bağlantı türü: Rozet makarası klipsi; Kemer klipsi; Karabina; Anahtar halkası ve zincir; Papağan klips; Manyetik klips; S-biner (çift kapılı karabina); Vidalı klips; Geçmeli halka; Döner yaylı kanca; Tetikli klips; Diğer
hr-HR: Vrsta pričvršćivanja privjeska za ključeve: Kopča na izvlačenje za značku; Kopča za remen; Karabiner; Prsten + lančić; Karabin kopča; Magnetska kopča; S-karabiner (karabiner s dvostrukim zaporom); Kopča s navojem; Rascjepni prsten; Okretna karabin kopča; Opružna kopča; Ostalo
zh-TW: 鑰匙圈連接件類型: 伸縮證件夾扣; 皮帶夾; 登山扣; 鑰匙圈加鍊條; 龍蝦扣; 磁吸扣; S 型扣環 (雙向登山扣); 螺絲鎖扣; 雙圈環; 旋轉按扣; 扳機扣; 其他
en: Keychain attachment type: Badge reel clip; Belt clip; Carabiner; Keyring + chain; Lobster clasp; Magnetic clasp; S-biner (double-gate carabiner); Screw-lock clasp; Split ring; Swivel snap hook; Trigger clip; Other
sv: Typ av nyckelringsfäste: Jojo-klämma för bricka; Bältesklämma; Karbinhake; Nyckelring + kedja; Karbinlås; Magnetlås; S-biner (karbinhake med dubbla grindar); Skruvlås; Delad ring; Roterande karbinhake; Pistolhake; Övrigt
nl: Sleutelhanger bevestiging type: Badge-rolclip; Riemclip; Karabijnhaak; Sleutelring + ketting; Karabijnsluiting; Magnetische sluiting; S-biner (dubbele karabijnhaak); Schroefsluiting; Splitring; Draaibare karabijnhaak; Triggerclip; Anders
th: ประเภทของที่ติดพวงกุญแจ: คลิปโยโย่ห้อยบัตร; คลิปหนีบเข็มขัด; คาราบิเนอร์; พวงกุญแจพร้อมโซ่; ตะขอก้ามปู; ตะขอแม่เหล็ก; เอสไบเนอร์ (คาราบิเนอร์ล็อกสองหัว); ตะขอเกลียวล็อก; ห่วงแยก; ตะขอคอหมาแบบหมุนได้; คลิปไกปืน; อื่นๆ
de: Befestigungsart des Schlüsselanhängers: Badge-Jojo-Clip; Gürtelclip; Karabiner; Schlüsselring + Kette; Karabinerverschluss; Magnetverschluss; S-Biner (Doppelkarabiner); Schraubverschluss; Spaltring; Drehkarabiner; Auslöseclip; Sonstige
pt-PT: Tipo de fixação para porta-chaves: Clipe de rolo para selo; Clipe de cinto; Mosquetão; Argola para chaves e corrente; Fecho mosquetão; Fecho magnético; S-biner (mosquetão de gatilho duplo); Fecho com trava de rosca; Argola dividida; Mosquetão giratório; Clipe de gatilho; Outro
bg-BG: Тип закрепване на ключодържател: Клипс за макара за значка; Клипс за колан; Карабинер; Халка за ключове + верижка; Закопчалка тип омар; Магнитна закопчалка; S-biner (карабинер с двойна ключалка); Закопчалка с винт; Халка тип сплит; Въртящ се карабинер; Клипс със спусък; Друго
sl-SI: Vrsta pritrditve obeska za ključe: Sponka z navijalno vrvico za značko; Sponka za pas; Vponka; Obroček za ključe + verižica; Zaponka karabin; Magnetna zaponka; S-vponka (vponka z dvojnim zaklepom); Zaponka na vijak; Razcepni obroček; Vrtljiv vskočnik; Sprožilna sponka; Drugo
da: Nøgleringstilbehørstype: Clips til badge-kortholder; Bælteclips; Karabinhage; Nøglering og -kæde; Karabinlås; Magnetlås; S-biner (karabinhage med dobbelt port); Skruelås; Splitring; Drejelig karabinhage; Krog med fjederlås; Andet
ro-RO: Tip de atașare pentru breloc: Clemă cu rolă pentru ecuson; Clemă pentru curea; Carabinieră; Inel pentru chei + lanț; Închizătoare tip clește; Închizătoare magnetică; S-biner (carabinieră cu două brațe); Închizătoare cu șurub; Inel despicat; Carabină rotativă; Clemă cu declanșator; Altele
cs: Typ uchycení na klíčenku: Klip s navijákem na odznak; Spona na opasek; Karabina; Kroužek na klíče + řetízek; Bižuterní karabinka; Magnetická spona; S-biner (karabina se dvěma zámky); Šroubovací spona; Dělený kroužek; Otočná karabina; Karabina se spouští; Jiné
pt-BR: Chaveiro tipo de fixação: Clipe retrátil para crachá; Clipe de cinto; Mosquetão; Argola para chaves + corrente; Fecho lagosta; Fecho magnético; S-biner (mosquetão duplo); Fecho com trava de rosca; Argola; Mosquetão giratório; Clipe de gatilho; Outro
ko: 열쇠고리 부착 유형: 배지 릴 클립; 벨트 클립; 카라비너; 키 링 및 체인; 랍스터 클래스프; 마그네틱 클래스프; S 비너(더블 게이트 카라비너); 스크류 록 클래스프; 스플릿 링; 스위블 스냅 훅; 트리거 클립; 기타
lt-LT: Raktų pakabuko tvirtinimo tipas: Sutraukiamas ženklelio segtukas; Diržo segtukas; Karabinas; Raktų žiedas + grandinėlė; Karabino užsegimas; Magnetinis užsegimas; S formos karabinas (dvigubas); Sraigtinis užsegimas; Spyruoklinis žiedas; Sukamasis kabliukas; Segtukas su gaiduku; Kita
zh-CN: 钥匙扣连接方式: 易拉扣; 皮带夹; 登山扣; 钥匙圈 + 链条; 龙虾扣; 磁扣; S 型快挂（双向登山扣）; 螺旋锁扣; 开口环; 旋转狗扣; 板机扣; 其他
hu: Kulcstartó rögzítési típusa: Jelvénybehúzó csipesz; Övcsipesz; Karabiner; Kulcskarika és lánc; Karabineres kapocs; Mágneses kapocs; S-karabiner (kétnyílású karabiner); Csavaros záras kapocs; Hasított karika; Forgó karabiner; Kioldós csipesz; Egyéb
nb: Nøkkelringfestets type: Kortholderklips; Belteklips; Karabinkrok; Nøkkelring + kjede; Karabinlås; Magnetlås; S-biner (dobbel karabinkrok); Skrulås; Splittring; Svingbar krok; Fjærkrok; Annet